North Carolina, session 2025, SB1052.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 110-86 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(6a) License-exempt family, friend, and neighbor (FFN) child care provider. – An
individual who satisfies each of the following:
a. Provides child care to one or more children who are not the individual's
own biological, adopted, or step-children, or children for whom the
individual is a legal guardian.
b. Operates in a setting, including the caregiver's home or the home of
the child, that is not required to be licensed as a child care facility
under this Article by virtue of the number of children served, the nature
of the arrangement, or an applicable exemption under G.S. 110-86(2).
c. Has a pre-existing familial, social, or community relationship with the
child or the child's family, including but not limited to a grandparent,
aunt, uncle, sibling over the age of 18, family friend, or neighbor.
d. Is in compliance with all applicable requirements for legally operating
a child care arrangement under State law, including, but not limited to,
any notification, disclosure, or registration requirements adopted by
the Department pursuant to this Article.
*S1052-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The term does not include individuals who are required to obtain a license
under this Article. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require
license-exempt FFN providers to obtain a license, to register with the State, or
to comply with any requirement not otherwise applicable to unlicensed child
care arrangements under this Article, unless otherwise required by law."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education (Division), the
sum of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to
implement the following:
(1) Update public-facing materials, including the Division's website, printed
guides, and licensing portal, to incorporate the definition of "license-exempt
family, friend, and neighbor (FFN) child care provider" established under
G.S. 110-86(6a), as enacted by Section 1 of this act, and to clearly
communicate to the public the legal status of FFN providers and the
distinction between license-exempt FFN arrangements and licensed child care
facilities.
(2) Revise internal legal guidance documents, policy manuals, and staff training
materials within the Division to reflect the new statutory definition and its
application to eligibility determinations, program access, and enforcement
decisions.
(3) Update the Division's data collection and reporting systems to enable tracking
of license-exempt FFN providers as a distinct provider category, including the
number of such providers accessing State or federally administered programs,
the number of children served, and any relevant demographic or geographic
data, to the extent such information is voluntarily reported or otherwise
available to the Division.
SECTION 3. Existing exemptions from child care facility licensing requirements
under G.S. 110-86(2), including care provided by relatives and cooperative parent arrangements,
are retained without modification. G.S. 110-86(6a), as enacted by Section 1 of this act shall be
construed consistently with those exemptions.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1052-First Edition